Illinois, session 104th, HB1168.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 5changing Section 2.09 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/2.09)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)8    Sec. 2.09. "Day care center" means any child care facility 9which regularly provides day care for less than 24 hours per 10day, except as provided for in Section 5.12, for (1) more than 118 children in a family home, or (2) more than 3 children in a 12facility other than a family home, including senior citizen 13buildings. 14    The term does not include: 15        (a) programs operated by (i) public or private 16    elementary school systems or secondary level school units 17    or institutions of higher learning that serve children who 18    shall have attained the age of 3 years or (ii) private 19    entities on the grounds of public or private elementary or 20    secondary schools and that serve children who have 21    attained the age of 3 years, except that this exception 22    applies only to the facility and not to the private 23    entities' personnel operating the program;   HB1168 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 05848 AAS 15879 b1        (b) programs or that portion of the program which 2    serves children who shall have attained the age of 3 years 3    and which are recognized by the State Board of Education; 4        (c) educational program or programs serving children 5    who shall have attained the age of 3 years and which are 6    operated by a school which is registered with the State 7    Board of Education and which is recognized or accredited 8    by a recognized national or multistate educational 9    organization or association which regularly recognizes or 10    accredits schools; 11        (d) programs which exclusively serve or that portion 12    of the program which serves children with disabilities who 13    shall have attained the age of 3 years but are less than 21 14    years of age and which are registered and approved as 15    meeting standards of the State Board of Education and 16    applicable fire marshal standards; 17        (e) facilities operated in connection with a shopping 18    center or service, religious services, or other similar 19    facility, where transient children are cared for 20    temporarily while parents or custodians of the children 21    are occupied on the premises and readily available; 22        (f) any type of day care center that is conducted on 23    federal government premises; 24        (g) special activities programs, including athletics, 25    recreation, crafts instruction, and similar activities 26    conducted on a an organized and periodic basis by civic,   HB1168 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 05848 AAS 15879 b1    charitable, or and governmental organizations, including, 2    but not limited to, programs offered by arboretums or park 3    districts organized under the Park District Code to 4    children who shall have attained the age of 3 years old if 5    the program meets no more than 3.5 continuous hours at a 6    time or less and no more than 25 hours during any week, and 7    the park district conducts background investigations on 8    employees of the program pursuant to Section 8-23 of the 9    Park District Code or the arboretum conducts background 10    investigations on employees of the program pursuant to 11    this Act; 12        (h) part day child care facilities, as defined in 13    Section 2.10 of this Act; 14        (i) programs or that portion of the program which: 15            (1) serves children who shall have attained the 16        age of 3 years; 17            (2) is operated by churches or religious 18        institutions as described in Section 501(c)(3) of the 19        federal Internal Revenue Code; 20            (3) receives no governmental aid; 21            (4) is operated as a component of a religious, 22        nonprofit elementary school; 23            (5) operates primarily to provide religious 24        education; and 25            (6) meets appropriate State or local health and 26        fire safety standards; or   HB1168 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 05848 AAS 15879 b1        (j) programs or portions of programs that: 2            (1) serve only school-age children and youth 3        (defined as full-time kindergarten children, as 4        defined in 89 Ill. Adm. Code 407.45, or older); 5            (2) are organized to promote childhood learning, 6        child and youth development, educational or 7        recreational activities, or character-building; 8            (3) operate primarily during out-of-school time or 9        at times when school is not normally in session; 10            (4) comply with the standards of the Illinois 11        Department of Public Health (77 Ill. Adm. Code 750) or 12        the local health department, the Illinois State Fire 13        Marshal (41 Ill. Adm. Code 100), and the following 14        additional health and safety requirements: procedures 15        for employee and volunteer emergency preparedness and 16        practice drills; procedures to ensure that first aid 17        kits are maintained and ready to use; the placement of 18        a minimum level of liability insurance as determined 19        by the Department; procedures for the availability of 20        a working telephone that is onsite and accessible at 21        all times; procedures to ensure that emergency phone 22        numbers are posted onsite; and a restriction on 23        handgun or weapon possession onsite, except if 24        possessed by a peace officer; 25            (5) perform and maintain authorization and results 26        of criminal history checks through the Illinois State   HB1168 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 05848 AAS 15879 b1        Police and FBI and checks of the Illinois Sex Offender 2        Registry, the National Sex Offender Registry, and 3        Child Abuse and Neglect Tracking System for employees 4        and volunteers who work directly with children; 5            (6) make hiring decisions in accordance with the 6        prohibitions against barrier crimes as specified in 7        Section 4.2 of this Act or in Section 21B-80 of the 8        School Code; 9            (7) provide parents with written disclosure that 10        the operations of the program are not regulated by 11        licensing requirements; and 12            (8) obtain and maintain records showing the first 13        and last name and date of birth of the child, name, 14        address, and telephone number of each parent, 15        emergency contact information, and written 16        authorization for medical care.17    Programs or portions of programs requesting Child Care 18Assistance Program (CCAP) funding and otherwise meeting the 19requirements under item (j) shall request exemption from the 20Department and be determined exempt prior to receiving funding 21and must annually meet the eligibility requirements and be 22appropriate for payment under the CCAP.23    Programs or portions of programs under item (j) that do 24not receive State or federal funds must comply with staff 25qualification and training standards established by rule by 26the Department of Human Services. The Department of Human   HB1168 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 05848 AAS 15879 b1Services shall set such standards after review of Afterschool 2for Children and Teens Now (ACT Now) evidence-based quality 3standards developed for school-age out-of-school time 4programs, feedback from the school-age out-of-school time 5program professionals, and review of out-of-school time 6professional development frameworks and quality tools.7    Out-of-school time programs for school-age youth that 8receive State or federal funds must comply with only those 9staff qualifications and training standards set for the 10program by the State or federal entity issuing the funds. 11    For purposes of items (a), (b), (c), (d), and (i) of this 12Section, "children who shall have attained the age of 3 years" 13shall mean children who are 3 years of age, but less than 4 14years of age, at the time of enrollment in the program.15(Source: P.A. 103-153, eff. 6-30-23; 103-952, eff. 1-1-25.) 16    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)17    Sec. 2.09. "Day care center" means any child care facility 18which regularly provides day care for less than 24 hours per 19day, except as provided for in Section 5.12, for (1) more than 208 children in a family home, or (2) more than 3 children in a 21facility other than a family home, including senior citizen 22buildings. 23    The term does not include: 24        (a) programs operated by (i) public or private 25    elementary school systems or secondary level school units   HB1168 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 05848 AAS 15879 b1    or institutions of higher learning that serve children who 2    shall have attained the age of 3 years or (ii) private 3    entities on the grounds of public or private elementary or 4    secondary schools and that serve children who have 5    attained the age of 3 years, except that this exception 6    applies only to the facility and not to the private 7    entities' personnel operating the program; 8        (b) programs or that portion of the program which 9    serves children who shall have attained the age of 3 years 10    and which are recognized by the State Board of Education; 11        (c) educational program or programs serving children 12    who shall have attained the age of 3 years and which are 13    operated by a school which is registered with the State 14    Board of Education and which is recognized or accredited 15    by a recognized national or multistate educational 16    organization or association which regularly recognizes or 17    accredits schools; 18        (d) programs which exclusively serve or that portion 19    of the program which serves children with disabilities who 20    shall have attained the age of 3 years but are less than 21 21    years of age and which are registered and approved as 22    meeting standards of the State Board of Education and 23    applicable fire marshal standards; 24        (e) facilities operated in connection with a shopping 25    center or service, religious services, or other similar 26    facility, where transient children are cared for   HB1168 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 05848 AAS 15879 b1    temporarily while parents or custodians of the children 2    are occupied on the premises and readily available; 3        (f) any type of day care center that is conducted on 4    federal government premises; 5        (g) special activities programs, including athletics, 6    recreation, crafts instruction, and similar activities 7    conducted on a an organized and periodic basis by civic, 8    charitable, or and governmental organizations, including, 9    but not limited to, programs offered by arboretums or park 10    districts organized under the Park District Code to 11    children who shall have attained the age of 3 years old if 12    the program meets no more than 3.5 continuous hours at a 13    time or less and no more than 25 hours during any week, and 14    the park district conducts background investigations on 15    employees of the program pursuant to Section 8-23 of the 16    Park District Code or the arboretum conducts background 17    investigations on employees of the program pursuant to 18    this Act; 19        (h) part day child care facilities, as defined in 20    Section 2.10 of this Act; 21        (i) programs or that portion of the program which: 22            (1) serves children who shall have attained the 23        age of 3 years; 24            (2) is operated by churches or religious 25        institutions as described in Section 501(c)(3) of the 26        federal Internal Revenue Code;   HB1168 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 05848 AAS 15879 b1            (3) receives no governmental aid; 2            (4) is operated as a component of a religious, 3        nonprofit elementary school; 4            (5) operates primarily to provide religious 5        education; and 6            (6) meets appropriate State or local health and 7        fire safety standards; or 8        (j) programs or portions of programs that: 9            (1) serve only school-age children and youth 10        (defined as full-time kindergarten children, as 11        defined in 89 Ill. Adm. Code 407.45, or older); 12            (2) are organized to promote childhood learning, 13        child and youth development, educational or 14        recreational activities, or character-building; 15            (3) operate primarily during out-of-school time or 16        at times when school is not normally in session; 17            (4) comply with the standards of the Illinois 18        Department of Public Health (77 Ill. Adm. Code 750) or 19        the local health department, the Illinois State Fire 20        Marshal (41 Ill. Adm. Code 100), and the following 21        additional health and safety requirements: procedures 22        for employee and volunteer emergency preparedness and 23        practice drills; procedures to ensure that first aid 24        kits are maintained and ready to use; the placement of 25        a minimum level of liability insurance as determined 26        by the Department; procedures for the availability of   HB1168 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 05848 AAS 15879 b1        a working telephone that is onsite and accessible at 2        all times; procedures to ensure that emergency phone 3        numbers are posted onsite; and a restriction on 4        handgun or weapon possession onsite, except if 5        possessed by a peace officer; 6            (5) perform and maintain authorization and results 7        of criminal history checks through the Illinois State 8        Police and FBI and checks of the Illinois Sex Offender 9        Registry, the National Sex Offender Registry, and 10        Child Abuse and Neglect Tracking System for employees 11        and volunteers who work directly with children; 12            (6) make hiring decisions in accordance with the 13        prohibitions against barrier crimes as specified in 14        Section 4.2 of this Act or in Section 21B-80 of the 15        School Code; 16            (7) provide parents with written disclosure that 17        the operations of the program are not regulated by 18        licensing requirements; and 19            (8) obtain and maintain records showing the first 20        and last name and date of birth of the child, name, 21        address, and telephone number of each parent, 22        emergency contact information, and written 23        authorization for medical care.24    Out-of-school time programs for school-age youth that 25receive State or federal funds must comply with only those 26staff qualifications and training standards set for the   HB1168 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 05848 AAS 15879 b1program by the State or federal entity issuing the funds. 2    For purposes of items (a), (b), (c), (d), and (i) of this 3Section, "children who shall have attained the age of 3 years" 4shall mean children who are 3 years of age, but less than 4 5years of age, at the time of enrollment in the program.6(Source: P.A. 103-153, eff. 6-30-23; 103-594, eff. 7-1-26; 7103-952, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 8    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 9changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 10that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 11represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 12not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 13made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 14Public Act.